Utah statutes.
53-9-103.   Commissioner of Public Safety to administer -- Bureau to issue
licenses -- Records -- Bonds -- Rulemaking.
(1)  The commissioner of the Department of Public Safety shall administer this
chapter.
(2) (a)  The bureau, acting at the direction of the commissioner, shall issue
a private investigator license to any applicant who meets qualifications for
licensure under Section 53-9-108.
(b)  The bureau shall issue a license to a qualified apprentice applicant
within five business days of receipt of the application.
(3) (a)  The bureau shall keep records of:
(i)  all applications for licenses under this chapter; and
(ii)  all bonds and proof of workers' compensation required to be filed.
(b)  The records shall include statements as to whether a license or renewal
license has been issued for each application and bond.
(4)  If a license is revoked, suspended, canceled, or denied or if a licensee
is placed on probation, the date of filing the order for revocation,
suspension, cancellation, denial, or probation shall be included in the
records.
(5)  The bureau shall maintain:
(a)  a list of all licensees whose license has been revoked, suspended, placed
on probation, or canceled; and
(b)  a written record of complaints filed against licensees.
(6)  The commissioner may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, necessary to administer this chapter.
